Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-1160
State Board of Education; rules and regulations.

The State Board of Education may adopt, promulgate, and publish rules and regulations necessary to carry out the Special Education Act.

Laws 1973, LB 403, § 29;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 43-660;

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 48;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3348;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 842;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 825;

Laws 1997, LB 346, § 41;

Laws 2019, LB675, § 45.